Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201668-604
Agreement with federal government;
instrumentality jointly created with other state.

Any instrumentality
jointly created by this state and any other state or states is hereby authorized,
upon the granting of like authority by such other state or states, (1) to
enter into an agreement with the Secretary of Health and Human Services whereby
the benefits of the federal old age and survivors' insurance system shall
be extended to employees of such instrumentality, (2) to require its employees
to pay, and for that purpose to deduct from their wages, contributions equal
to the amounts which they would be required to pay under section 68-605 if
they were covered by an agreement made pursuant to section 68-603, and (3)
to make payments to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States in
accordance with such agreement, including payments from its own funds, and
otherwise to comply with such agreements. Such an agreement shall, to the
extent practicable, be consistent with the terms and provisions of section
68-603 and other provisions of sections 68-601 to 68-631.

Laws 1951, c. 297, § 3(2), p. 980;

Laws 1955, c. 264, § 4, p. 816;

Laws 1984, LB 933, § 4;

Laws 1990, LB 820, § 4;

Laws 2000, LB 1216, § 11;

Laws 2010, LB684, § 4.